Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 35

Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund Act

Effective Dates. Acts 2003, No 1762, § 2: Apr. 22, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the insurance market is volatile and that insurance costs are increasing; that assistance is immediately necessary to minimize insurance costs; that establishment of a trust fund is immediately necessary to protect state agency budgets from insurance market volatility; and that this subchapter is designed to provide property, inland marine, boiler and machinery, and automobile liability and physical damage coverage for state agencies participating in the trust fund. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No 1188, § 3: Apr. 7, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that cyber incidents, including data breaches, business interruption, and network damage, present an immediate and ongoing threat to the efficient operation of state government; that obtaining cybersecurity insurance and contributing to a more robust cybersecurity insurance market will facilitate the adoption of appropriate preventative measures and best practices to guard against this threat; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect the state and its computer networks from cyber attacks that may interrupt the provision of state services or damage computer networks at great expense to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-35-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund Act”.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1.

25-35-102. Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Annual aggregate deductible” means the maximum amount payable annually from the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund for covered losses;

“Insurance Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of the State Insurance Department or the commissioner's successor;

“Risk manager” means the Administrator of the Risk Management Division of the State Insurance Department;

“State agency” means any state agency, board, bureau, commission, council, department, institution, or other similar entity; and

“Trust fund” means the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1.

25-35-103. Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a separate fund to be known as the “Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund”.

No money shall be appropriated from the trust fund for any purpose except to pay:

Insurance and reinsurance premiums;

Loss adjustment expenses;

Related educational and training expenses;

Insured claims falling below the annual aggregate deductible level;

Expenses including actuarial, consultant, and service contract fees; and

Cybersecurity risk insurance premiums and expenses.

The assets of the trust fund may be invested and reinvested as the Insurance Commissioner may determine.

All income derived through investment of the trust fund as established under this chapter shall be credited as investment income to the trust fund.

For the purposes of investment, trust fund moneys invested and interest earned thereon shall be administered as trust funds.

All moneys deposited to the trust fund shall not be subject to any deduction, tax, levy, or any other type of assessment.

All moneys received by the risk manager, including, but not limited to, the premiums collected and any insured loss or loss expenses paid by insurance or reinsurance companies shall be deposited in the trust fund created in this section.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (b)(6).

State agencies participating in the State Master Property Policy as of June 30, 2003;

The Division of Correction;

The Division of Community Correction; and

State agencies participating in the Arkansas State Master Vehicle Policy as of June 30, 2003.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “Effective July 1, 2003” at the beginning of the introductory language of (a); and substituted “State Risk Manager” for “risk manager” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(2); and substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a)(3).

Study the risks of all participating state agencies and their properties;

Promulgate the form for insurance and reinsurance policies and other forms;

Issue certificates of coverage to state agencies for any risks covered by the trust fund;

Make recommendations about risk management and risk reduction strategies to participating state agencies;

Review participating state agency building construction, major remodeling plans, program plans, and make recommendations to the participating state agency about needed changes to address risk considerations;

Utilize underwriting discretion and authority to deny coverage of any risk deemed to adversely affect the financial stability of the trust fund;

Establish values for participating state agency buildings and structures to be insured;

Attend state agency planning and management meetings;

Review any proposed legislation and communicate with members of the General Assembly and legislative committees about the liability or risk management issues connected with any legislation; and

Solicit any needed information about state agency plans, state agency programs, or state agency risks necessary to perform the responsibilities under this chapter.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1; Acts 2015, No. 1188, § 1.

25-35-104. Participation.

The following agencies shall participate in the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund:

Upon approval by the State Risk Manager, other state agencies may participate in the trust fund.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1; 2015, No. 1188, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 1025.

25-35-105. Administration.

The Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund shall be administered by the Insurance Commissioner.

At the discretion of the commissioner, the risk manager may:

Enter into contracts;

Purchase insurance and reinsurance in accordance with the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq.;

Adjust, settle, and pay or deny claims with notice to a claimant;

Pay expenses and costs;

(1)The risk manager may expend moneys from the trust fund to procure and provide coverage to all participating state agencies and their indemnified employees except those agencies or employees specifically exempted by statute or elsewhere in this chapter.

The risk manager shall apportion the costs of coverage under subdivision (c)(1) of this section consistent with this chapter.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1.

25-35-106. Premiums and schedules of coverage and endorsements.

(1)Premiums shall be charged to each agency based on the rates established by the risk manager that include all costs associated with the operation of the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund, based upon sound rating techniques.

The risk manager shall provide premium billings to participating state agencies for each renewal and for participating agency changes occurring during the policy year.

If any participating state agency fails to pay its premium charges within thirty (30) days after the due date, the risk manager shall notify the delinquent state agency that coverage will be cancelled due to nonpayment of premium unless the delinquent payment is made within thirty (30) days of the notice.

Funds appropriated or otherwise made available to participating state agencies for payment of premium shall not be reduced as a result of any shortfall of projected revenues.

The risk manager will provide each agency with a renewal schedule of coverage and an endorsement for each participating state agency change occurring during the policy year.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1.

25-35-107. Payment of losses.

The risk manager shall establish:

Appropriate policies and procedures governing the payment of losses from the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund, including notice or proof of loss by any participating state agency; and

Policies and procedures governing disputes that may arise between the risk manager and any person having charge over the property in question concerning the extent of loss or damage.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1.

25-35-108. Limits on use of risk management data as evidence.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any report, recommendation, survey, schedule, list, or data compiled, or action taken or not taken by or at the request of the risk manager to identify, evaluate, or plan the safety enhancement or risk reduction of any potential accident sites or other hazards related to any entity covered by the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund may not be admitted into evidence in any court or used for any other purposes in any action for damages arising from any occurrence at a location mentioned or addressed in the reports, recommendation, survey, schedule, list, or data.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1762, § 1.